Arkansas, session 2025, HB1698.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-51-404(b), concerning exclusions from
"gross income" under the Income Tax Act of 1929, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(36)(A) Contributions by an employer for an employee's
membership in a healthcare sharing ministry as defined in § 23-60-104 or
other medical cost-sharing program.
*JLL249*
03-31-2025 11:24:33 JLL249

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 H3/31/25 HB1698
(B) A self-employed person may claim the exclusion
provided under subdivision (b)(36)(A) of this section for contributions for
his or her own membership in a healthcare sharing ministry as defined in §
23-60-104 or other medical cost-sharing program.
(C) As used in this subdivision (b)(36), "medical cost-
sharing program" means a healthcare funding arrangement in which members
contribute money to help cover each other’s medical expenses.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 51, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-51-462. Deduction — Employer contributions for employee's
membership in healthcare sharing ministry or other medical cost-sharing
program.
(a) In computing net income for the purposes of this chapter, there is
allowed as a deduction in addition to all other deductions allowed by law for
an employer's contribution for an employee's membership in a health care
sharing ministry as defined in § 23-60-104 or other medical cost-sharing
program.
(b) A self-employed person may claim the deduction provided under this
section for contributions for his or her own membership in a healthcare
sharing ministry as defined in § 23-60-104 or other medical cost-sharing
program.
(c) As used in this section, "medical cost-sharing program" means a
healthcare funding arrangement in which members contribute money to help
cover each other’s medical expenses.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.

/s/Torres






03-31-2025 11:24:33 JLL249